California, session 20252026, AB1640.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 22.4.5 (commencing with Section 22599.7) is added to Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code, to read: CHAPTER 22.4.5. California Restaurant Reservation AntiPiracy Act22599.7. This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Restaurant Reservation AntiPiracy Act.22599.8. For purposes of this chapter, “restaurant” means a retail food establishment in this state that prepares, serves, and vends food directly to a customer.22599.9. A person shall not sell or transfer, or facilitate the sale or transfer of, a reservation for a restaurant for an amount higher than that person paid to acquire the reservation. This section shall not apply if the person has a written agreement with the restaurant that expressly authorizes the person to charge the higher amount.22599.10. (a) A person who violates or causes another person to violate this chapter shall be liable for the following, as applicable, in a civil action brought by the Attorney General, or any county counsel or city attorney, in a court of competent jurisdiction:(1) A civil penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation.(2) Injunctive or declaratory relief.(3) Reasonable attorney’s fees.(b) An individual or entity who suffers actual harm as a result of a violation of this chapter may bring a civil action to recover all of the following:(1) Actual damages.(2) Reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.(3) Injunctive or declaratory relief.(4) Any other relief the court deems proper.22599.11. (a) There is hereby created in the State Treasury the California Restaurant Reservation AntiPiracy Act Fund, Fund into which any civil penalty recovered by the Attorney General pursuant to Section 22599.10 shall be deposited.(b) Moneys in the fund shall be available, only upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purpose of administering this chapter.